New Jersey, session 221, S4477.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Carcinogen means any chemical identified as follows: (1)   Group 1 carcinogen or group 2A carcinogen by the World Health Organization or the International Agency for Research on Cancer; (2)   Known to be a human carcinogen and reasonably anticipated to be a human carcinogen by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, pursuant to paragraph 4 of subsection (b) of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. s.241); or (3)   Group A carcinogens or group B carcinogens by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. Chemical means a substance with a distinct molecular composition or a group of structurally related substances and includes the breakdown products of the substance or substances that form through decomposition, degradation, or metabolism. Hair product means a product made through the synthesis of artificial materials such as polyester, nylon, acrylic, or cellulose to create fibers that undergo various processes to resemble human hair. Reproductive toxicant means a chemical identified as a reproductive or developmental toxicant by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, National Toxicology Program, Center for the Evaluation of Risks to Human Reproduction. Volatile organic compound means the same as that term is defined by section 2 of P.L.1995, c.188 (C.26:2C-2). b.    It shall be an unlawful practice and a violation of P.L.1960, c.39 for any person to manufacture, sell, distribute, or offer for sale in this State a hair product that emits volatile organic compounds when used as intended, or contains an intentionally added carcinogen, reproductive toxicant, or flame resistant chemical. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the thirteenth month after enactment except that the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs may take any anticipatory administrative action as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act.